Nebraska, session 109, LB100.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB100 LB100
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Business Innovation and Startup Act.
Sec. 2. (1) The Office of Business, Entrepreneurship, and
Innovation is hereby created within the Department of Economic
Development.
(2) The office shall employ personnel, which shall include at least
one full-time equivalent employee, to create and strengthen policies and
programs supporting the growth of innovation and entrepreneurship in the
state, including across demographic segments and geographic areas that
are underserved.
(3) The office shall work with stakeholders and organizations to
support entrepreneurship by enhancing learning and skills, providing
technical support, and expanding access to resources and capital for
entrepreneurs.
(4) The office shall serve as a point of contact to assist
businesses that have been in operation for five years or less in their
interactions with state government.
(5) No later than July 1, 2026, and no later than July 1 of each
year thereafter, the office shall prepare an annual report detailing:
(a) The extent to which state legislation that was passed during the
most recently completed legislative session impacts business, innovation,
and entrepreneurship;
(b) Efforts undertaken by the office in helping to support, grow,
and maintain business owners; and
(c) Strategic goals for the office for the current year and for the
following five years.
Sec. 3. (1) No later than July 1, 2026, and no later than July 1 of
each year thereafter, the Director of Economic Development, in
conjunction with the Office of Business, Entrepreneurship, and Innovation
created under section 2 of this act, shall electronically file a report
with the Legislature that includes, but is not limited to:
-2-

LB100 LB100
2025 2025
(a) The number and total dollar amount of state contracts awarded to
businesses that have been in operation for less than five years,
including a breakdown by demographic segments and geographical areas
throughout the state;
(b) The percentage of state contracts awarded to businesses that
have been in operation for less than five years;
(c) The percentage of the total dollar amount of state contracts
awarded to businesses that have been in operation for less than five
years; and
(d) Any recommendations on improving access to state contracts for
Nebraska businesses that have been in operation for less than five years,
including those businesses in statistically underrepresented demographic
segments and geographic areas of Nebraska.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2026, state agencies are encouraged to award
five percent of the total number of state contracts to businesses that
have been in operation for less than five years and whose principal place
of business is in this state.
Sec. 4. (1) No later than July 1, 2026, and no later than July 1 of
each year thereafter, the Commissioner of Labor shall electronically file
a report with the Legislature that includes, but is not limited to:
(a) The percentage of workforce development funding, including
funding allocated by the Nebraska Workforce Development Board and local
workforce development boards, that is allocated to individuals starting
new businesses or to individuals or entities that provide services to
businesses established within the previous five years and whose principal
place of business is in this state; and
(b) The total dollar amount of workforce development funding,
including funding allocated by the Nebraska Workforce Development Board
and local workforce development boards, that is allocated to individuals
starting new businesses or to individuals or entities that provide
services to businesses established within the previous five years and
-3-

LB100 LB100
2025 2025
whose principal place of business is in this state.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2026, the Nebraska Workforce Development Board
and local workforce development boards are encouraged to allocate five
percent of workforce development funding to organizations and programs
that support (a) individuals starting new businesses or (b) individuals
and entities that provide services to businesses established within the
previous five years and whose principal place of business is in this
state.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) Local workforce development board means a local workforce
development board authorized by the federal Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act and established in Nebraska; and
(b) Nebraska Workforce Development Board means the state workforce
development board authorized by the federal Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act and established in Nebraska.
Sec. 5. (1) No later than July 1, 2026, and no later than July 1 of
each year thereafter, the Director of Economic Development shall
electronically file a report with the Legislature that includes, but is
not limited to:
(a) The percentage of economic development funds awarded to (i)
individuals starting new businesses or (ii) individuals and entities that
provide services to businesses established within the previous five years
and whose principal place of business is in this state; and
(b) The total dollar amount of economic development funds awarded to
(i) individuals starting new businesses or (ii) individuals and entities
that provide services to businesses established within the previous five
years and whose principal place of business is in this state.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2026, the Department of Economic Development
is encouraged to award five percent of economic development funds to (i)
individuals starting new businesses or (ii) individuals and entities that
provide services to businesses established within the previous five years
-4-

LB100 LB100
2025 2025
and whose principal place of business is in this state.
(3) For purposes of this section, economic development funds means
the amount budgeted for economic development programs administered by the
Department of Economic Development, including community development block
grants.
Sec. 6. Beginning July 1, 2026, state agencies and political
subdivisions in this state are encouraged to eliminate business license
and registration fees for any new business, including a home-based
business, whose principal place of business is in this state.
Sec. 7. Beginning July 1, 2026, the state investment officer is
encouraged to invest up to five percent of state funds available for
investment, and is required to invest one percent of such funds, into
venture capital funds that agree to invest dollar for dollar into
businesses that have been in operation for less than five years and whose
principal place of business is in this state.
-5-